src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON PRON_DEM_IS_ILL
+Dem+Ill: K ;



!2018-10-21!LEXICON PRON_INTER_NONHUM
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Nom: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Gen:лӧн K ; !
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Abl:лысь K ; !
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Dat:лы K ; !
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+ZeroAcc: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Acc3:сӧ WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Ins:ӧн K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Com:кӧд K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Car:тӧг K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Cns:ла K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Ine:ын K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Ela:ысь K ; 
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Ill:ӧ K ; !
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Apr:лань K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Egr:сянь K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Prl:ӧд K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Tra:ті K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Ter:ӧдз K ;

LEXICON PRON_NEG_HUM
+Neg+Sg+Nom: WordEnd ;
+Neg+Sg+Nom:і WordEnd ;
+Neg+Sg: PRON_NEG_OBL ;
+Neg+Pl+Nom:%>ъяс WordEnd ;
+Neg+Pl:%>ъяс PRON_NEG_OBL ;

LEXICON PRON_DUAL
+Du: PRON_NEG_OBL ;

! LEXICON PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL
! +Coll:нан PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_PERS ;
! +ZeroColl: PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_PERS ;
! +ZeroColl+PxPl2+Acc2:ныдтӧ PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_INDEF ;
! +Coll+Acc2+PxPl2:наннытӧ PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_INDEF ;
! 
! LEXICON PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_PERS
! +PxPl1:ным PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_CASES ;
! +PxPl2:ныд PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_CASES ;
! +PxPl3:ныс PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_CASES ;
! +Acc+PxPl1:нымӧс PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_INDEF ;
! +Acc3+PxPl3:ныссӧ PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_INDEF ;
! 
! LEXICON PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_CASES
! +Nom: PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_INDEF ;
! +Gen:лӧн PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_INDEF ;
! +Abl:лысь PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_INDEF ;
! +Dat:лы PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_INDEF ;
! +Ins:ӧн PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_INDEF ;
! +Com:кӧд PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_INDEF ;
! +Car:тӧг PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_INDEF ;
! +Cns:ла PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_INDEF ;
! +Ine:ын PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_INDEF ;
! +Ela:ысь PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_INDEF ;
! +Ill:ӧ PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_INDEF ;
! +Apr:лань PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_INDEF ;
! +Egr:сянь PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_INDEF ;
! +Tra:ті PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_INDEF ;
! +Ter:ӧдз PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_INDEF ;
! 
! LEXICON PRON_INTER_REL_HUM_COLL_INDEF
! +Der/kw+Indef:кӧ K ;
!  K ;

!Actually there might be reason to consider +Der/MWN
LEXICON PRONQ_MUKOD
!2017-09-20+Pron+Abs: WordEnd ;
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Sg: PRONQ_STAV_CASES ;
+Pl+Nom:ъяс K ;
+Pl:ъяс PRONQ_STAV_CASES ;

LEXICON PRONQ_STAV
!2017-09-20+Pron+Abs: WordEnd ;
+Sg+Nom: K ;
!+Pron+Sg+ZeroAcc: K ;
+Sg: PRONQ_STAV_CASES ;

LEXICON PRONQ_STAV_CASES
+Nom+PxSg2:ыд K ;
+Nom+PxSg3:ыс K ;
+Nom+PxPl1:ным K ;
+Nom+PxPl1+Err/Dial:нум K ;
+Nom+PxPl2:ныд K ;
+Nom+PxPl3:ныс K ;

 INS/MORPH_THEN_K ;
+Ins+PxSg1:нам K ;
+Ins+PxSg2:над K ;
+Ins+PxSg3:нас K ;
+Ins+PxPl1:нымӧн K ; ! Should there be a Der/wn tag?
+Ins+PxPl1+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+Err/Dial:нумен K ; ! Should there be a Der/wn tag?
+Ins+PxPl2:ныдӧн K ; ! Should there be a Der/wn tag?
+Ins+PxPl3:нысӧн K ; ! Should there be a Der/wn tag?

 ELA/MORPH_THEN_K ;
+Ela+PxSg3:сьыс K ;
+Ela+PxPl1+So/CP:сьыным K ;
+Ela+PxPl1+So/PC:нымысь K ;
+Ela+PxPl1+So/CP+Err/Dial:сьынум K ;
+Ela+PxPl1+So/PC+Err/Dial:нумысь K ;
+Ela+PxPl2+So/CP:сьыныд K ;
+Ela+PxPl2+So/PC:ныдысь K ;
+Ela+PxPl3+So/CP:сьыныс K ;
+Ela+PxPl3+So/PC:нысысь K ;

 GEN/MORPH_THEN_K ;
+Gen+PxSg3:ыслӧн K ;
+Gen+PxPl1:нымлӧн K ;
+Gen+PxPl1+Err/Dial:нумлен K ;
+Gen+PxPl2:ныдлӧн K ;
+Gen+PxPl3:ныслӧн K ;

+Acc:ӧс K ;
+Acc+PxSg1:ӧс K ;
+Acc+PxSg2:тӧ K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Acc+PxSg2:тэ K ;
+Acc+PxSg3:сӧ K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Acc+PxSg3:сэ K ;
+Acc+PxPl1:нымӧс K ;
+Acc+PxPl1+Err/Dial:нумес K ;
+Acc+PxPl2:нытӧ K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Acc+PxPl2:нытэ K ;
+Acc+PxPl3:нысӧ K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Acc+PxPl3:нысэ K ;

+Dat+PxSg2:ыдлы K ; ! This far 2017-03-19
+Dat+PxSg3:ыслы K ;
+Dat+PxPl1:нымлы K ;
+Dat+PxPl1+Err/Dial:нумлы K ;
+Dat+PxPl2:ныдлы K ;
+Dat+PxPl3:ныслы K ;

 ABL/MORPH_THEN_K ;
+Abl+PxSg3:ыслысь K ;
+Abl+PxPl1:нымлысь K ;
+Abl+PxPl1+Err/Dial:нумлысь K ;
+Abl+PxPl2:ныдлысь K ;
+Abl+PxPl3:ныслысь K ;

 COM/MORPH_THEN_K ;
+Com+PxSg3:ыскӧд K ;
+Com+Com+PxPl1:нымкӧд K ;
+Com+Com+PxPl1+Err/Dial:нумкед K ;
+Com+PxPl2:ныдкӧд K ;
+Com+PxPl3:ныскӧд K ;

 CAR/MORPH_THEN_K ;
+Car+PxSg3:ыстӧг K ;
+Car+PxPl1:нымтӧг K ;
+Car+PxPl1+Err/Dial:нумтег K ;
+Car+PxPl2:ныдтӧг K ;
+Car+PxPl3:ныстӧг K ;

 CNS/MORPH_THEN_K ;
+Cns+PxSg3:ысла K ;
+Cns+PxPl1:нымла K ;
+Cns+PxPl1+Err/Dial:нумла K ;
+Cns+PxPl2:ныдла K ;
+Cns+PxPl3:нысла K ;

 CMPR/MORPH_THEN_K ;

 INE/MORPH_THEN_K ;
+Ine+PxPl1:нымын K ;
+Ine+PxPl1+Err/Dial:нумын K ;
+Ine+PxPl2:ныдын K ;
+Ine+PxPl3:нысын K ;

 ILL/MORPH_THEN_K ;
+Ill+PxPl1:нымӧ K ;
+Ill+PxPl1+Err/Dial:нуме K ;
+Ill+PxPl2:ныдӧ K ;
+Ill+PxPl3:нысӧ K ;

 EGR/MORPH_THEN_K ;
+Egr+PxSg3+So/CP:сяньыс K ;
+Egr+PxSg3+So/PC:ыссянь K ;
+Egr+PxPl1+So/CP:сяньным K ;
+Egr+PxPl1+So/PC:нымсянь K ;
+Egr+PxPl1+So/CP+Err/Dial:сяньнум K ;
+Egr+PxPl1+So/PC+Err/Dial:нумсянь K ;
+Egr+PxPl2+So/CP:сяньныд K ;
+Egr+PxPl2+So/PC:ныдсянь K ;
+Egr+PxPl3:ныссянь K ;

 APR/MORPH_THEN_K ;
+Apr+PxSg3:ланьыс K ;
+Apr+PxSg3:ыслань K ;
+Apr+PxPl1:нымлань K ;
+Apr+PxPl1+Err/Dial:нумлань K ;
+Apr+PxPl2:ныдлань K ;
+Apr+PxPl3:ныслань K ;

 TRA/MORPH_THEN_K ;
+Tra+PxSg3:тіыс K ;
+Tra+PxSg3:ысті K ;
+Tra+PxPl1:нымті K ;
+Tra+PxPl1+Err/Dial:нумті K ;
+Tra+PxPl2:ныдті K ;
+Tra+PxPl3:нысті K ;

 TER/MORPH_THEN_K ;
+Ter+PxSg3:ысӧдз K ;
+Ter+PxPl1:нымӧдз K ;
+Ter+PxPl1+Err/Dial:нумедз K ;
+Ter+PxPl2:ныдӧдз K ;
+Ter+PxPl3:нысӧдз K ;



! COMPARATIVE ; ! sg/pl?
LEXICON DISTR_ON_CASE
+Sg: PRONQ_COLL_CASE ; ! sg/pl?
COP_PL ;
! быдӧн, 

LEXICON PRONQ_COLL
+Coll+Sg: PRONQ_COLL_CASE ; ! sg/pl?
COP_PL ;

! ӧтнасӧн, ӧтнамӧн, ӧтнадӧн, ставӧн, кымынӧн, унаӧн, кыкӧн

LEXICON PRONQ_COLL_CASE
!ӧнія коми кыв 2000: 183
 NOM/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 GEN/MORPH_THEN_K ;
+Gen+PxSg2:ыдлӧн K ;
+Gen+PxSg3:ыслӧн K ;
 ABL/MORPH_THEN_K ;
+Abl+PxSg2:ыдлысь K ;
+Abl+PxSg3:ыслысь K ;
 DAT/MORPH_THEN_K ;
+Dat+PxSg2:ыдлысь K ;
+Dat+PxSg3:ыслысь K ;
+Acc:ӧс K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Acc:%>эс K ;
+Acc+PxSg2:тӧ K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Acc+PxSg2:тэ K ;
+Acc+PxSg3:сӧ K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Acc+PxSg3:сэ K ;
 INS/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 COM/MORPH_THEN_K ;
+Com+PxSg2:ыдкӧд K ;
+Com+PxSg3:ыскӧд K ;
 CAR/MORPH_THEN_K ;
+Car+PxSg2:тӧгыд K ;
+Car+PxSg3:тӧгыс K ;
 CNS/MORPH_THEN_K ;
+Cns+PxSg2:ыдла K ;
+Cns+PxSg3:ысла K ;
 INE/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 ELA/MORPH_THEN_K ;
+Ela+PxSg2:сьыд K ;
+Ela+PxSg3:сьыс K ;
 ILL/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 APR/MORPH_THEN_K ;
+Apr+PxSg2:ланьыд K ;
+Apr+PxSg3:ланьыс K ;
 EGR/MORPH_THEN_K ;
+Egr+PxSg2:сяньыд K ;
+Egr+PxSg3:сяньыс K ;
 TRA/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 TER/MORPH_THEN_K ;
+Ter+PxSg2:ӧдзыд K ;
+Ter+PxSg3:ӧдзыс K ;

LEXICON PRONQ_ATAG
+Qnt+A: K ;
+Qnt+A+Der/MWN: Noun1 ;

LEXICON PRON_QNT_
+Qnt: COMPARATIVE ; ! sg/pl?

!2018-10-21!LEXICON PRON_QNT_PL
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Qnt+Pl: WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRON_QNT_IS_ILL
+Qnt+Ill: K ;


LEXICON PRON_NEG_End
+Neg: K ;

LEXICON PRON_NEG_A
+Der+Neg+A: WordEnd ;
+Der+Neg+A+Sg+Nom: WordEnd ;
+Der+Neg+A+Sg: PRON_NEG_OBL ;
!+Pron+Neg+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom: WordEnd ;
!+Pron+Neg+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg: PRON_NEG_OBL ;

LEXICON PRON_NEG_ADV
+Der+Neg+Adv: COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON PRON_NEG_IN_LA
+Neg+Der/la+Spat: PRON_NEG_SPAT ;

LEXICON PRON_NEG_ITER
+Der+Neg+Der/ysj+Adv: K ; !+Iter

LEXICON PRON_NEG
+Neg+Sg: PRON_NEG_0 ;
+Neg+Sg: PRON_NEG_J ;
+Neg+Pl:ъяс PRON_NEG_0 ;
+Neg+Pl:ъяс PRON_NEG_J ;

LEXICON PRON_NEG_0/J
+Neg+Sg: PRON_NEG_0 ;
+Neg+Sg:й PRON_NEG_J ;
+Neg+Pl:ъяс PRON_NEG_0 ;
+Neg+Pl:ъяс PRON_NEG_J ;

LEXICON PRON_NEG_0
+Nom: WordEnd ;
+Gen:лӧн WordEnd ;
 ABL/MORPH_THEN_K ;
+Dat:лы WordEnd ;
+Acc+PxSg2:тӧ WordEnd ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Acc+PxSg2:тэ WordEnd ;
+Acc+PxSg3:сӧ WordEnd ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Acc+PxSg3:сэ WordEnd ;
 COM/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 CAR/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 CNS/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 APR/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 EGR/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 TRA/MORPH_THEN_K ;

LEXICON PRON_NEG_J
+Acc+PxSg1:%>ӧс WordEnd ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Acc+PxSg1:%>эс WordEnd ;
 INS/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 INE/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 ELA/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 ILL/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 TER/MORPH_THEN_K ;
