src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON pronouns
быд+Pron:быд PRON_QNT_  "joka" ;
быдся+Pron:быдся PRON_QNT_  "joka" ;
быдсяма+Pron:быдсяма PRON_QNT_  "joka" ;
быдсӧн+Pron:быдсӧн PRONQ_COLL  "kaikki" ;
кыкӧн+Pron:кыкӧн PRONQ_COLL  "jokainen" ;
кымын+Adv:кымын PRON_QNT_  "kuinka monta" ;
мукӧд+Pron:мукӧд PRONQ_MUKOD  "muu" ;
мыйла+Adv:мыйла PRON_QNT_  "miksi" ;
мӧдар+Pron:мӧдар PRON_QNT_  "toinen" ;
мӧдар+Pron:мӧдар PRONQ_ATAG  "" ;
некин+Pron:некин PRON_NEG_HUM  "" ;
некод+Pron:некод PRON_NEG_HUM  "ei kukaan" ;
некодар+Pron:некодар PRON_NEG  "" ;
некодыр+Pron:некодыр PRON_NEG_End  "" ;
некор+Adv:некор PRON_NEG_End  "" ;
некутшӧм+v1+Pron:некутшӧм PRON_NEG_A  "" ;
некутшӧм+v2+Pron+Err/Dial:некутшем PRON_NEG_A  "" ;
некутшӧма+Adv:некутшӧма PRON_NEG_ADV  "" ;
некыдз+Adv:некыдз PRON_NEG_End  "" ;
некыдзи+Adv:некыдзи PRON_NEG_End  "" ;
некымын+Adv:некымын PRON_NEG  "" ;
некымынлаын+Adv:некымынлаын PRON_NEG_IN_LA  "" ;
некымынысь+Adv:некымынысь PRON_NEG_ITER  "" ;
нем+Pron:нем PRON_NEG  "ei mitään" ;
немтор+Pron:немтор PRON_NEG_0/J  "" ;
неуна+Adv:неуна PRON_QNT_  "hieman" ;
нинӧкод+Pron:нинӧкод PRON_NEG  "" ;
нинӧкутшӧм+Pron:нинӧкутшӧм PRON_NEG_A  "" ;
нинӧм+Pron:нинӧм PRON_NEG  "" ;
нинӧмтор+Pron:нинӧмтор PRON_NEG_0/J  "" ;
ньӧти+Adv:ньӧти PRON_QNT_  "ei lainkaan" ;
став+Pron:став PRONQ_STAV  "kaikki" ;
ставӧн+Pron:ставӧн PRONQ_COLL  "kaikki" ;
сыа-мэа+Pron:сыа-мэа PRON_DUAL  "" ;
сымда+Adv:сымда PRON_QNT_  "" ;
сымда-мында+Adv:сымда-мында PRON_QNT_  "" ;
тэа-мэа+Pron:тэа-мэа PRON_DUAL  "" ;
унаӧн+Adv:унаӧн PRONQ_COLL  "monet" ;
этшаӧн+Pron:этшаӧн PRONQ_COLL  "harvat" ;
ӧтар+Pron:ӧтар PRONQ_ATAG  "toinen" ;
ӧтар-мӧдар+Pron:ӧтар-мӧдар PRONQ_ATAG  "" ;
ӧтмӧдар+Pron:ӧтмӧдар PRONQ_ATAG  "" ;
